Maine, session 132, LD932.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 7 MRSA §83, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 563, §3, is amended to
read:
2. Issuance of license. If satisfied that an applicant will comply or, if an applicant has
previously held a license, that the applicant has complied and will continue to comply with
the requirements of this chapter and rules adopted pursuant to this chapter, the
commissioner may issue a license to the applicant for an agricultural fair. A license is issued
for 3 4 consecutive years and only for the dates assigned by the commissioner in accordance
with section 84.
Sec. 2. 7 MRSA §84, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 563, §3, is amended to
read:
1. Assigned fair dates. The commissioner shall set the dates for which an agricultural
fair license is effective in accordance with rules adopted pursuant to section 82, subsection
5. No later than May 15th of the calendar year preceding the first year of each 3-year 4-year
license period, the commissioner shall announce the assignment of fair dates and issuance
of licenses.
Page 1 - 132LR1049(03)

Sec. 3. 7 MRSA §86, sub-§7, ¶A, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 563, §3, is amended
to read:
A. Upon receiving an initial license, spend a minimum of $750 per year on premiums
for 3 4 years for displays of agricultural products, excluding premiums for equine and
ox pulling contests and farm tractor and pickup truck pulling contests; and
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR1049(03)